Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 7. Compensation

Compensation does not include any factor for loss of business,

including the rental value of the land taken. L.U. Sheep Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 790 P.2d 663,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1990).

Jury not to consider appraisers' recommendation. —

The involvement of appraisers pursuant to Rule 71.1, W.R.C.P., in effect, constitutes a panel like a special master to advise the court, and the product of the appraisers' deliberations and consideration of just compensation should not be weighed in the balance of evidence at a jury trial, which clearly is a determination de novo and not a review of the appraisers' recommendation. L.U. Sheep Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 790 P.2d 663,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1990).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Use of Opinion Testimony for Valuing Real Property in an Eminent Domain Suit,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 43 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

26 Am. Jur. 2d Eminent Domain §§ 112 to 114.

Assemblage or plottage as factor affecting value in eminent domain proceedings, 8 ALR4th 1202.

Eminent domain: Compensability of loss of view from owner's property — state cases, 25 ALR4th 671.

Liability for damage to land or its occupants from dust, gases, odors, vibration, or the like, occasioned by defendant's continuous vehicular use of adjoining or nearby public highway, 25 ALR4th 1192.

29A C.J.S. Eminent Domain §§ 71 to 200.

§ 1-26-701.
Compensation standards.

An owner of property or an interest in property taken by eminent domain is entitled to compensation determined under the standards prescribed by W.S.

1-26-701

through

1-26-713

.

Unless otherwise provided by law, the right to compensation accrues upon the date of possession by the condemnor.

Except as specifically provided by W.S.

1-26-701

through

1-26-713

, compensation, damages, or other relief to which a person is otherwise entitled under this act or other law are not affected, but duplication of payment is not permitted.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For meaning of “this act,” see § 1-26-502(a)(vi).

Quoted

in

Miller v. Campbell County, 901 P.2d 1107,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 1995).

§ 1-26-702.
Compensation for taking.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the measure of compensation for a taking of property is its fair market value determined under W.S.

1-26-704

as of the date of valuation.

If there is a partial taking of property, the measure of compensation is the greater of the value of the property rights taken or the amount by which the fair market value of the entire property immediately before the taking exceeds the fair market value of the remainder immediately after the taking.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1.

Measure of compensation for partial taking.

—

Trial court properly entered a judgment as a matter of law on the ground that no jury would be able to determine the before and after value of property based on the evidence presented because the estimated costs for changes to the property did not equate to “fair market value"; the estimated costs did not reflect the value of an arms-length transaction for the sale of the property, did not establish the lack of a market for the property, and did not establish comparable sales. Byrnes v. Johnson Cty. Comm’rs, 2020 WY 6; 2020 Wyo. LEXIS
(January 13, 2020).

Trial court properly entered a judgment as a matter of law because the value of the property taken was not established; the only values presented were the value of the property after the road expansion, estimated costs of amending the driveway approaches, and an overall estimate of all costs, and under either of the two measures of damages in a partial takings case, the jury would not have been able to reach a conclusion based on the limited evidence presented. Byrnes v. Johnson Cty. Comm’rs, 2020 WY 6; 2020 Wyo. LEXIS
(January 13, 2020).

The landowner whose property is the subject of a partial taking is entitled to prove not only the difference between the fair market value of the property prior to the taking and the fair market value of the remainder after the taking, under the “before and after rule,” but he also is entitled to prove the value of the property rights taken. The measure of compensation is the greater of those alternative amounts. L.U. Sheep Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 790 P.2d 663,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1990).

The Wyoming Eminent Domain Act and the cases interpreting those provisions require that the homeowners whose homes were condemned by the county receive fair market value as just compensation for any property taken by the county or, for a partial taking, the greater of the property rights taken or the amount by which the fair market value of the property is diminished. Miller v. Campbell County, 901 P.2d 1107,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 1995).

District court could consider evidence of comparable easements
in determining just compensation for pipeline easements condemned
by a carbon dioxide pipeline developer, but erroneously rejected some
comparable easements on the basis that they were not the result of
arms' length transactions or that they related to a natural gas pipeline.
Further, annual payments were allowed as compensation.
Barlow Ranch, L.P. v. Greencore Pipeline Co. LLC, 2013 WY 34, 301 P.3d 75,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 2013).

Collateral source rule. —

The collateral source rule is not applicable in an inverse condemnation action, and the forgiveness of mortgages or payments from the Abandoned Mine Reclamation Fund must be credited against any compensation award for the fair market value of the land taken or for the diminution in value of land partially taken. Otherwise, the homeowners would receive a double recovery, a “windfall.” Miller v. Campbell County, 901 P.2d 1107,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 1995).

Quoted

in

Mayland v. Flitner, 2001 WY 69, 28 P.3d 838,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 2001).

Cited

in

Wyo. Res. Corp. v. T-Chair Land Co., 2002 WY 104, 49 P.3d 999,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 2002).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Fear of powerline, gas or oil pipeline, or related structure as element of damages in easement condemnation proceeding, 23 ALR4th 631.

Eminent domain: compensability of loss of view from owner's property — state cases, 25 ALR4th 671.

Liability for damage to land or its occupants from dust, gases, odors, vibration, or the like, occasioned by defendant's continuous vehicular use of adjoining or nearby public highway, 25 ALR4th 1192.

Eminent domain: measure and elements of damages or compensation for condemnation of public transportation system, 35 ALR4th 1263.

Eminent domain: compensability of loss of visibility of owner's property, 7 ALR5th 113.

§ 1-26-703.
Date of valuation.

The date of valuation
is the date upon which the condemnation action was commenced.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming Eminent Domain Act: Comment on the Act and Rule 71.1 of the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 739 (1983).

§ 1-26-704.
Fair market value defined.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section:

The fair market value of property for which there is a relevant market is the price which would be agreed to by an informed seller who is willing but not obligated to sell, and an informed buyer who is willing but not obligated to buy;

The fair market value of property for which there is no relevant market is its value as determined by any method of valuation that is just and equitable;

The determination of fair market value shall use generally accepted appraisal techniques and may include:

The value determined by appraisal of the property performed by a certified appraiser;

The price paid for other comparable easements or leases of comparable type, size and location on the same or similar property;

Values paid for transactions of comparable type, size and location by other public or private entities in arms length transactions for comparable transactions on the same or similar property.

The fair market value of property owned by an entity organized and operated upon a nonprofit basis is deemed to be not less than the reasonable cost of functional replacement if the following conditions exist:

The property is devoted to and is needed by the owner in order to continue in good faith its actual use to perform a public function, or to render nonprofit educational, religious, charitable or eleemosynary services; and

The facilities or services are available to the general public.

The cost of functional replacement under subsection (b) of this section includes:

The cost of a functionally equivalent site;

The cost of relocating and rehabilitating improvements taken, or if relocation and rehabilitation is impracticable, the cost of providing improvements of substantially comparable character and of the same or equal utility; and

The cost of betterments and enlargements required by law or by current construction and utilization standards for similar facilities.

In determining fair market value under this section, no terms or conditions of an agreement containing a confidentiality provision shall be required to be disclosed unless the release of such information is compelled by lawful discovery, upon a finding that the information sought is relevant to a claim or defense of any party in the eminent domain action. The court shall ensure that any such information required to be disclosed remains confidential. The provision of this subsection shall not apply if the information is contained in a document recorded in the county clerk’s office or has otherwise been made public.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1; 2007, ch. 139, § 2; 2013 ch. 201, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (a)(iii); and added (d).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in (a)(iii)(C), substituted “public or private entities” for “companies.”

Value of property.—

Comparables for pipeline easement

Value of property.—

Trial court properly entered a judgment as a matter of law on the ground that no jury would be able to determine the before and after value of property based on the evidence presented because the estimated costs for changes to the property did not equate to “fair market value"; the estimated costs did not reflect the value of an arms-length transaction for the sale of the property, did not establish the lack of a market for the property, and did not establish comparable sales. Byrnes v. Johnson Cty. Comm'rs, 2020 WY 6, 455 P.3d 693,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 2020).

Trial court properly entered a judgment as a matter of law because the value of the property taken was not established; the only values presented were the value of the property after the road expansion, estimated costs of amending the driveway approaches, and an overall estimate of all costs, and under either of the two measures of damages in a partial takings case, the jury would not have been able to reach a conclusion based on the limited evidence presented. Byrnes v. Johnson Cty. Comm'rs, 2020 WY 6, 455 P.3d 693,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 2020).

Comparables for pipeline easement

District court could consider evidence of comparable easements in determining just compensation for pipeline easements condemned by a carbon dioxide pipeline developer, but erroneously rejected some comparable easements on the basis that they were not the result of arms' length transactions or that they related to a natural gas pipeline. Further, annual payments were allowed as compensation.
Barlow Ranch, L.P. v. Greencore Pipeline Co. LLC, 2013 WY 34, 301 P.3d 75,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 2013).

Law reviews. —

For article,
“The More Things Change, The More Things Stay The Same: A Practitioner’s Guide to Recent Changes in Wyoming’s Eminent Domain Act” see
8 Wyo. L. Rev. 1 (2008).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Assemblage or plottage as factor affecting value in eminent domain proceedings, 8 ALR4th 1202.

Fear of powerline, gas or oil pipeline, or related structure as element of damages in easement condemnation proceeding, 23 ALR4th 631.

§ 1-26-705.
Effect of condemnation action on value.

The fair market value of the property taken, or of the entire property if there is a partial taking, does not include an increase or decrease in value before the date of valuation that is caused by:

The proposed improvement or project for which the property is taken;

The reasonable likelihood that the property would be acquired for that improvement or project; or

The condemnation action in which the property is taken.

If, before completion of the project as originally adopted, the project is expanded or changed to require the taking of additional property, the fair market value of the additional property does not include a decrease in value before the date of valuation, but does include an increase in value before the date on which it became reasonably likely that the expansion or change in the scope of the project would occur, if the decrease or increase is caused by any of the factors described in subsection (a) of this section.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this section, a decrease in value before the date of valuation which is caused by physical deterioration of the property within the reasonable control of the property owner, and by his unjustified neglect, may be considered in determining fair market value.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Eminent domain: compensability of loss of visibility of owner's property, 7 ALR5th 113.

§ 1-26-706.
Compensation
to reflect project as planned.

If there is a partial taking of property, the fair market value of the remainder on the valuation date shall reflect increases or decreases in value caused by the proposed project including:

Impairment of the use of his other property caused by the condemnation; and

The increase in damage to his property by the general public which could reasonably be expected to occur as a result of the proposed actions of the condemnor;

Any work to be performed under an agreement between the parties or pursuant to W.S.

1-26-714

.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1; 2007, ch. 139, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a)(iii) inserted “or pursuant to W.S.

1-26-714

” at the end of the sentence.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Applied

in

Wyo. Res. Corp. v. T-Chair Land Co., 2002 WY 104, 49 P.3d 999,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 2002).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Eminent domain: compensability of loss of visibility of owner's property, 7 ALR5th 113.

§ 1-26-707.
Special assessment proceedings excluded.

If there is a partial
taking of property and special assessments or charges are imposed
upon the remainder to pay for all or part of the project, the increase
in value of the remainder, if any, caused by the project shall be
considered in determining its value after the partial taking only
to the extent the increase exceeds the amount of the special assessments
or charges.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1.

§ 1-26-708.
Use by defendant; risk of loss.

Unless the court otherwise directs, the condemnee may use the property sought to be taken for any lawful purpose before the date on which the condemnor is authorized to take possession.

Thereafter, the condemnee may use the property only for any purpose or use which is not inconsistent with the estate taken by the condemnor. The uses authorized by subsection (a) of this section include any normal work on the property and the planting, cultivation and removal of crops.

The compensation awarded the condemnee shall include an amount sufficient to compensate for loss caused by any temporary restriction or limitation imposed by the court upon his right to use the property under subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming Eminent Domain Act: Comment on the Act and Rule 71.1 of the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 739 (1983).

§ 1-26-709.
Compensation for growing crops and improvements.

The compensation for crops growing on the property on the date of valuation is the higher of the current fair market value of the crops in place, assuming the right to bring them to maturity and to harvest them, or the amount by which the existence of the crops enhances the fair market value of the property.

The compensation for an interest in improvements is the higher of the fair market value of the improvements, assuming their immediate removal from the property, or the amount by which the existence of the improvements enhances the fair market value of the property.

If improvements are destroyed, removed or damaged by the condemnee after the date of valuation, the amount of compensation shall be adjusted to reflect the extent to which the fair market value of the property has thereby been reduced.

Crops or improvements that are first placed upon the property after the date of valuation shall be excluded from consideration in determining the amount of the award, except that the award shall be adjusted to include the reasonable and necessary cost of providing improvements required by law and improvements necessary to protect life or property as authorized by the court.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1.

Evidence of road construction costs deemed relevant. —

The taking of a private road encompasses the immediate removal of the road, which is an “improvement” within the contemplation of subsection (b). Consequently, evidence of road construction costs may well be relevant as to its market value. L.U. Sheep Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 790 P.2d 663,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1990).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming Eminent Domain Act: Comment on the Act and Rule 71.1 of the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 739 (1983).

§ 1-26-710.
Compensation for divided interests.

The amount of compensation
for the taking of property in which divided interests exist is based
upon the fair market value of the property considered as a whole.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1.

§ 1-26-711.
Taking of leasehold interest.

If all or part of the property taken includes a leasehold interest, the effect of the condemnation action upon the rights and obligations of the parties to the lease is governed by the provisions of the lease, and in the absence of applicable provisions in the lease, by this section.

If there is a partial taking and the part of the property taken includes a leasehold interest that extends to the remainder, the court may determine that:

The lease terminates as to the part of the property taken but remains in force as to the remainder, in which case the rent reserved in the lease is extinguished to the extent it is affected by the taking; or

The lease terminates as to both the part taken and the remainder, if the part taken is essential to the purposes of the lease or the remainder is no longer suitable for the purpose of the lease.

The termination or partial termination of a lease under this section shall occur at the earlier of the date on which, under an order of the court, the condemnor is permitted to take possession of the property, or the date on which title to the property is transferred to the condemnor.

This section does not affect or impair a lessee’s right to compensation if his leasehold interest is taken in whole or in part.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Power of municipal corporation to lease or sublet property owned or leased by it, 47 ALR3d 19.

Goodwill or “going concern” value as element of lessee's compensation for taking leasehold in eminent domain, 58 ALR3d 566.

Measure and elements of lessee's compensation for condemnor's taking or damaging of leasehold, 17 ALR4th 337.

Validity, construction, and effect of statute or lease provision expressly governing rights and compensation of lessee upon condemnation of leased property, 22 ALR5th 327.

§ 1-26-712.
Acquisition of property subject to lien.

Notwithstanding the provisions
of an agreement, if any, relating to a lien encumbering the property
neither the condemnor nor condemnee is liable to the lienholder for
any penalty for prepayment of the debt secured by the lien, and the
amount awarded by the judgment to the lienholder shall not include
any penalty therefor.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1.

§ 1-26-713.
Loss of goodwill.

In addition to fair market value determined under W.S.

1-26-704

, the owner of a business conducted on the property taken, or on the remainder if there is a partial taking, shall be compensated for loss of goodwill only if the owner proves that the loss:

Is caused by the taking of the property or the injury to the remainder;

Cannot reasonably be prevented by a relocation of the business or by taking steps and adopting procedures that a reasonably prudent person would take and adopt in preserving the goodwill;

Will not be included in relocation payments under W.S.

16-7-101

through

16-7-121

; and

Will not be duplicated in the compensation awarded to the owner.

Within the meaning of this section, “goodwill” consists of the benefits that accrue to a business as a result of its location, reputation for dependability, skill or quality and any other circumstances resulting in probable retention of old or acquisition of new patronage.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming Eminent Domain Act: Comment on the Act and Rule 71.1 of the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 739 (1983).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Goodwill or “going concern” value as element of lessee's compensation for taking leasehold in eminent domain, 58 ALR3d 566.

§ 1-26-714.
Reclamation
and restoration.

A condemnor who acquires a property right or interest of less than fee simple title in any land shall be responsible for reclamation on such land and for restoration of the land and any improvements thereon. The reclamation and restoration shall return the property and improvements to the condition existing prior to the condemnation to the extent that reasonably can be accomplished.

Reclamation and restoration shall include but not be limited to, grading to the natural contour, replacement of topsoil, the planting and establishment of appropriate ground cover and control of weeds resulting from condemnor’s disturbance, as follows:

In the case of a growing crop for which compensation has been paid, a ground cover shall be required only if requested by the condemnee;

In the case of grazing lands, native grasses and forbs previously growing on the disturbed land shall be reseeded and established unless the establishment of alternative beneficial plants are agreed to by the parties.

The responsibility of the condemnor under this section shall include the following:

Damages caused by the condemnor, its successors or its agents during entry prior to condemnation as authorized by W.S.

1-26-506

and

1-26-507

;

Damages caused by the condemnor, its successors or its agents during construction of the project under the condemnation;

Damages caused by the condemnor, its successors or its agents subsequent to the construction and during the use of the property during the time of the condemnor’s possession;

Damages caused by the condemnor, its successors or its agents in the removal of any facilities or improvements on the property at the termination of the authorized use;

Restoration and reclamation shall begin as soon as reasonably possible after completion of project construction, unless otherwise agreed to by the condemnor and the condemnee.

Nothing herein shall preclude the condemnor and the condemnee from agreeing to compensation in lieu of the obligations provided in this section.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 139, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 139, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2007.

Compensation for reclamation separate from compensation for
taking

District court was not required to consider, as an element of just compensation for a pipeline developer's taking of easements for a pipeline, the developer's reclamation responsibility under
Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-26-714

at the time the easement terminated. Compensation for reclamation was separate from, and in addition to, the compensation for the taking.
Barlow Ranch, L.P. v. Greencore Pipeline Co. LLC, 2013 WY 34, 301 P.3d 75,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 2013).